North Carolina, session 2025, SB24.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. HEALTH BENEFIT MANDATE LEGISLATION
SECTION 1. Article 31 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 120-272. Legislation containing health benefit mandates.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Health benefit mandate. – A regulation impacting a health benefit plan or the
State Health Plan that meets any of the following criteria:
a. Mandates that a health benefit plan or the State Health Plan provide
coverage of any healthcare service, any specific treatment or set of
treatments, or any prescription drug used for the treatment of any
health, physical, mental, or behavioral condition.
b. Requires that a health benefit plan or the State Health Plan include
coverage for any healthcare service or treatment by a provider or group
*S24-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of providers other than an individual licensed under Article 1 of
Chapter 90, Article 4A of Chapter 90, or Article 9A of Chapter 90 of
the General Statutes.
c. Places requirements on any cost-sharing mechanism utilized by a
health benefit plan or the State Health Plan, such as a copayment or
deductible.
d. Regulates any health benefit plan or the State Health Plan cost-control
process, including those that necessitate a healthcare provider obtain
advance approval from an insurer before a specific service, treatment,
or prescription benefit is delivered to the patient or utilized by the
patient in order to qualify for coverage under the applicable plan.
e. Places a limit or requirement on a pharmacy benefits manager under
Article 56A of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.
f. Regulates the manner in which a health benefit plan or the State Health
Plan provides coverage for a healthcare service, treatment, or
prescription drug, regardless of whether the regulation is imposed
upon a covered service that is provided by a healthcare provider that
participates in the provider network of the health benefit plan.
(2) Health benefit plan. – As defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
(3) Piece of legislation. – Any introduced bill, any bill or proposed committee
substitute considered by a committee, or any bill, conference committee
report, or proposed conference committee substitute considered by either
chamber of the General Assembly.
(4) State Health Plan. – The North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers and
State Employees.
(b) Required Additional Statutory Repeals. – Any piece of legislation containing one or
more new health benefit mandates is required to also contain at least one provision that repeals
at least the same number of health benefit mandates that are already in effect as of the date of the
consideration of that piece of legislation prior to ratification of that legislation.
(c) Appropriation Required. – Any piece of legislation containing one or more health
benefit mandates is required to also contain a provision appropriating recurring funds in the
amount of the cost of that mandate to the Department of the State Treasurer and the State Health
Plan or to any other relevant State agency prior to ratification. If any repeal of an existing health
benefit mandate required to be contained in the legislation under subsection (b) of this section
results in cost-savings to the State, then that cost-savings shall have no impact on the amount
required to be appropriated under this subsection.
(d) Exception. – If an actuarial note required under G.S. 120-114 indicates there would
be a decrease in cost as a result of the health benefit mandates in a piece of legislation, then the
provisions of subsections (b) and (c) shall not apply."

PART II. IMPACT ON NORTH CAROLINA STATE HEALTH PLAN FOR TEACHERS
AND STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 2. G.S. 135-48.51 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-48.51. Coverage and operational mandates related to Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
(a) The following provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes apply to the State
Health Plan:
(1) G.S. 58-3-191, Managed care reporting and disclosure requirements.
(2) G.S. 58-3-221, Access to nonformulary and restricted access prescription
drugs.
(3) G.S. 58-3-223, Managed care access to specialist care.
Page 2 Senate Bill 24-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) G.S. 58-3-225, Prompt claim payments under health benefit plans.
(5) G.S. 58-3-235, Selection of specialist as primary care provider.
(6) G.S. 58-3-240, Direct access to pediatrician for minors.
(7) G.S. 58-3-245, Provider directories.
(7a) G.S. 58-3-247, Insurance identification card.
(8) G.S. 58-3-250, Payment obligations for covered services.
(9) G.S. 58-3-265, Prohibition on managed care provider incentives.
(10) G.S. 58-3-280, Coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of lymphedema.
(11) G.S. 58-3-285, Coverage for hearing aids.
(12) G.S. 58-50-30, Right to choose services of certain providers.
(13) G.S. 58-67-88, Continuity of care.
(b) A provision of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes containing a health benefit mandate,
as defined in G.S. 120-272, that first becomes effective on or after July 1, 2025, shall apply to
the State Health Plan as of the start of the next Plan year following the effective date of the health
benefit mandate."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act is effective 30 days after it becomes law and applies to pieces
of legislation considered by the General Assembly on or after that date.
Senate Bill 24-Second Edition Page 3